Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1104.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 1626(d) and 1632(a) of the act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, are amended to read:Section 1626. Reporting by Candidate and Political Committees and other Persons.--* * *(d) Pre-election reports by all candidates [for offices to be voted for by the electors of the State at large] and all 123456789101112131415161718192021222324 political committees, which have expended money for the purpose of influencing the election of such candidate, shall be filed not later than the sixth Tuesday before and the second Friday before an election, provided that the initial pre-election report shall be complete as of fifty (50) days prior to the election and the subsequent pre-election report shall be complete as of fifteen (15) days prior to the election. [Pre-election reports by all other candidates and political committees which have received contributions or made expenditures for the purpose of influencing an election shall be filed not later than the second Friday before an election, provided that such report be complete as of fifteen (15) days prior to the election.]* * *Section 1632. Late Filing Fee; Certificate of Filing.--(a) A late filing fee for each report or statement of expenditures and contributions which is not filed within the prescribed period shall be imposed as follows. Such fee shall be [ten dollars ($10) for each day or part of a day] two hundred fifty dollars ($250) on the first day or part of a day that a report is overdue. For each day or part of a day thereafter, excluding Saturdays, Sundays and holidays that a report is overdue[. An additional fee of ten dollars ($10) is due for each of the first six (6) days that a report is overdue. The maximum fee payable with respect to a single report is two hundred fifty dollars ($250).], the fee shall be twenty dollars ($20). A supervisor shall receive an overdue report or statement even if any late filing fee due has not been paid but the report or statement shall not be considered filed until all fees have been paid upon the receipt by the supervisor of an overdue report. No 20250SB1104PN1335 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 further late filing fees shall be incurred notwithstanding the fact that the report or statement is not considered filed. The late filing fee is the personal liability of the candidate or treasurer of a political committee and cannot be paid from contributions to the candidate or committee, nor may such fee be considered an expenditure. A report or statement of expenditures and contributions shall be deemed to have been filed within the prescribed time if the letter transmitting the report or statement which is received by the supervisor is transmitted by first class mail and is postmarked by the United States Postal Service on the day prior to the final day on which the report or statement is to be received: Provided, That this sentence shall not be applicable to the reporting requirements contained in section 1628.* * *Section 2. The amendment of sections 1626(d) and 1632(a) of the act shall apply only to reports and statements filed for elections held after the first primary, general, municipal or special election that occurs after the effective date of this section. The amendment of sections 1626(d) and 1632(a) of the act shall not apply to reports or statements required to be filed before the effective date of this section.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB1104PN1335 - 3 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223